Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 3. PARKS

CHAPTER 28. TEXAS TRAILS SYSTEM

Sec. 28.001. ESTABLISHMENT. The Texas Trails System is established under the administration of the department. The purposes of the system are to provide high-quality outdoor recreational, scenic, historic, and expedition trails and to promote the use and encourage the development of trails within the system.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5165, ch. 937, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Renumbered from Sec. 25.001 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(37), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 28.002. SYSTEM ADMINISTRATION. (a) The department may:

(1) develop a trails master plan for the orderly development of trails;

(2) designate qualifying trails within the state park system or on state lands as components of the trail system;

(3) enter into negotiations with federal, state, regional, local, and private agencies that administer trails to allow their trails to be included in the system;

(4) designate federal, state, regional, local, and private trails as components of the system after obtaining the consent of the owner or administering agency;

(5) remove trails from the system at the request of the owner or administering agency or to maintain the quality of the system;

(6) develop criteria and standards for trails in the system;

(7) classify trails in the system as recreational, scenic, historic, or expedition trails;

(8) provide a standardized terminology for trails within the system;

(9) provide a uniform marker for the trails within the system;

(10) provide technical assistance in planning or building trails to potential trail administrators; and

(11) publish information about the system to ensure public knowledge of the existence of the system and to encourage its use.

(b) The commission may adopt rules or take any other action necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5165, ch. 937, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Renumbered from Sec. 25.002 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(37), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 28.004. CLASSIFICATION. (a) The department shall classify trails in the system according to the classifications established in this section. A trail may have more than one classification or may be composed of several trails with different classifications. A trail may not include the main travelway portions of highways, roads, or streets that are provided primarily for motor vehicle traffic or motor vehicle travel routes that exist or may be established on such travelways.

(b) A recreational trail is a trail that:

(1) is in or near an urban area; and

(2) is primarily used for recreational or health benefits.

(c) A scenic trail is a trail that:

(1) is in a rural or urban area;

(2) is in an area containing natural and scenic qualities of at least regional significance; and

(3) is primarily used for enjoyment of its scenic qualities and vistas, such as travel through or to a natural environment.

(d) A historic trail is a trail that:

(1) is in a rural or urban area;

(2) provides access to or between historic sites, structures, or monuments of regional or statewide significance; and

(3) is used primarily for its historic connotations, such as the significance of a historic structure or the presentation of a historic episode.

(e) An expedition trail is a trail that:

(1) is in a rural area;

(2) provides extended travel through scenic and natural areas of regional or statewide significance; and

(3) may require some travel preparation.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5165, ch. 937, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983. Renumbered from Sec. 25.004 by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 5.01(a)(37), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.